District of Columbia statutes.
42-3501.02

Purposes.

In enacting this chapter, the Council of the District of Columbia supports the following statutory purposes:

(1)

To protect low- and moderate-income tenants from the erosion of their income from increased housing costs;

(2)

To provide incentives for the construction of new rental units and the rehabilitation of vacant rental units in the District;

(3)

To continue to improve the administrative machinery for the resolution of disputes and controversies between housing providers and tenants;

(4)

To protect the existing supply of rental housing from conversion to other uses; and

(5)

To prevent the erosion of moderately priced rental housing while providing housing providers and developers with a reasonable rate of return on their investments.

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 102, 32 DCR 3089
1981 Ed., § 45-2502.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3501.01.